New York, session 2025-2026, S8756.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3 of a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the 2 public health law relating to permitting a close friend to make an 3 anatomical gift of a decedent's body, as proposed in legislative bills 4 numbers S. 3360 and A. 1395, is amended to read as follows: 5 § 3. This act shall take effect on the [first of January next succeed- 6 ing the date on which] one hundred eightieth day after it shall have 7 become a law. Effective immediately, the commissioner of health is 8 authorized to take any actions necessary to implement the provisions of 9 this act on or before its effective date. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date in the same manner as 11 a chapter of the laws of 2025 amending the public health law relating to 12 permitting a close friend to make an anatomical gift of a decedent's 13 body, as proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 3360 and A. 1395, 14 takes effect. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03875-02-6